Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 2. Special Education.
§ 22.1-217.04.
Language development for children who are deaf or hard of hearing; assessment resources for parents and educators; advisory committee; report.

For the purposes of this section, “language developmental milestones” means milestones of development aligned to the existing instrument used to assess the development of children with disabilities pursuant to federal law.

The Department, in coordination with the Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, shall establish an advisory committee for the purpose of soliciting input from members on the selection of language developmental milestones for inclusion in a resource for use by parents of a child from birth to age five who is identified as deaf or hard of hearing to monitor and track the child’s expressive and receptive language acquisition and developmental stages toward English literacy. The advisory committee shall consist of 16 nonlegislative citizen members, nine of which shall be voting members as described in subdivision 2 and seven of which shall be nonvoting members as described in subdivision 3. The majority of members shall be deaf or hard of hearing, and all of the members shall have experience in the field of education of individuals who are deaf or hard of hearing. The advisory committee shall have a balance of members who personally, professionally, or parentally use the dual languages of American Sign Language and English and members who personally, professionally, or parentally use only spoken English.
B. 1. The Department, in coordination with the Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, shall establish an advisory committee for the purpose of soliciting input from members on the selection of language developmental milestones for inclusion in a resource for use by parents of a child from birth to age five who is identified as deaf or hard of hearing to monitor and track the child’s expressive and receptive language acquisition and developmental stages toward English literacy. The advisory committee shall consist of 16 nonlegislative citizen members, nine of which shall be voting members as described in subdivision 2 and seven of which shall be nonvoting members as described in subdivision 3. The majority of members shall be deaf or hard of hearing, and all of the members shall have experience in the field of education of individuals who are deaf or hard of hearing. The advisory committee shall have a balance of members who personally, professionally, or parentally use the dual languages of American Sign Language and English and members who personally, professionally, or parentally use only spoken English.

The nine voting members of the committee shall be as follows:

One parent of a child who is deaf or hard of hearing who has chosen American Sign Language as the primary language for his child;

One parent of a child who is deaf or hard of hearing who has chosen spoken language as the communication mode for his child;

One parent of a child who is deaf or hard of hearing who has chosen cued speech as the communication mode for his child;

One teacher for the deaf or hard of hearing or developmental specialist who possesses the highest skill level in the development of American Sign Language competence with experience in early intervention;

One teacher for the deaf or hard of hearing or developmental specialist who possesses the highest skill level in the development of spoken language competence for children with hearing loss with experience in early intervention;

One teacher for the deaf or hard of hearing or early intervention specialist who possesses the highest skill level in the development of cued speech or language competence with experience in early intervention;

One speech-language pathologist who possesses the highest skill level in the development of American Sign Language with experience in early intervention;

One speech-language pathologist who possesses the highest skill level in the development of spoken language for children with hearing loss with experience in early intervention; and

One service coordinator from early intervention with experience in providing families with unbiased information regarding communication methodologies available to families.

No later than January 1, 2023, the Department, in coordination with the Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, shall provide the advisory committee established pursuant to subsection B with a list of all existing language developmental milestones from standardized norms and any relevant information regarding such language developmental milestones for possible inclusion in the parent resource set forth in subsection D. No later than June 1, 2023, the advisory committee shall recommend language developmental milestones for inclusion in the parent resource and may make recommendations for tools or assessments to be included in an educator resource set forth in subsection E for use in assessing the language and literacy development of children from birth to age five who are deaf or hard of hearing. No later than June 30, 2023, the Department, in consultation with the Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, shall select language developmental milestones for inclusion in the parent resource and inform the advisory committee of its selections.

The Department, in consultation with the Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, shall, after considering the recommendations submitted by the advisory committee, select language developmental milestones for inclusion in a resource, and develop such resource, for use by parents of a child from birth to age five who is identified as deaf or hard of hearing to monitor and track the child’s expressive and receptive language acquisition and developmental stages toward English literacy. Such parent resource shall:

Be appropriate for use, in both content and administration, with children who use American Sign Language, English, or both;

Present the language developmental milestones selected pursuant to subsection C in terms of typical development of all children in a particular age range;

Be written for clarity and ease of use by parents;

Be aligned to the Department’s existing infant, toddler, and preschool guidelines; the existing instrument used to assess the development of children with disabilities pursuant to federal law; and state standards in English language arts;

Make clear that parents have the right to select American Sign Language, English, or both for their child’s language acquisition and developmental milestones;

Make clear that the parent resource is not a formal assessment of language and literacy development and that parents’ observations of their child may differ from formal assessment data presented at an Individual Family Service Plan (IFSP) or Individualized Education Program (IEP) meeting;

Explain that parents may bring the parent resource to an IFSP or IEP meeting for purposes of sharing their observations about their child’s development; and

Include fair, balanced, and comprehensive information about American Sign Language and English and respective communication modes as well as available services and programs.

The Department, the Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing, and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall jointly disseminate the resource to parents of children from birth to age five who are deaf or hard of hearing.

The Department, in coordination with the Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, shall, after considering any recommendations submitted by the advisory committee, select existing tools or assessments for early intervention specialists and educators for use in assessing the language and literacy development of children from birth to age five who are deaf or hard of hearing. Such tools or assessments shall:

Be in a format that shows stages of language and literacy development;

Be selected for use by educators to track the expressive and receptive language acquisition and developmental stages toward English literacy of children from birth to age five who are deaf or hard of hearing; and

Be appropriate, in both content and administration, for use with children who are deaf or hard of hearing and who use American Sign Language, English, or both.

The Department, the Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing, and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall jointly disseminate the tools or assessments selected pursuant to this subsection to local educational agencies and provide materials and training on their use. Such tools or assessments may be used by a child’s IFSP or IEP team, as applicable, to track the expressive and receptive language acquisition and developmental stages toward English literacy of such child or to establish or modify IFSP or IEP plans.

In addition to the powers and duties set forth above, the advisory committee may:

Advise the Department, the Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing, and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services or its contractor on the content and administration of the existing instrument used to assess the development of children who are deaf or hard of hearing in order to ensure the appropriate use of such instrument for the assessment of the language and literacy development of children from birth to age five who are deaf or hard of hearing; and

Make recommendations regarding future research to improve the measurement of the language and literacy development of children from birth to age five who are deaf or hard of hearing.

If a child from birth to age five who is deaf or hard of hearing does not demonstrate progress in expressive and receptive language skills as measured by one of the educator tools or assessments selected pursuant to subsection E or by the existing instrument used to assess the development of children who are deaf or hard of hearing, such child’s IFSP or IEP team, as applicable, shall explain in detail the reasons why the child is not meeting or progressing toward the language developmental milestones and shall recommend specific strategies, services, and programs that shall be provided to assist the child’s progress toward English literacy.

No later than August 1, 2024, and no later than August 1 of each year thereafter, the Department, in coordination with the Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, shall produce a report, using existing data reported in compliance with the federally required state performance plan on students with disabilities, that compares the language and literacy development of children from birth to age five who are deaf or hard of hearing with the language and literacy development of their peers who are not deaf or hard of hearing and shall make such report available to the public on its website.

The Department, the Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing, and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall comply with the provisions of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.) and the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. § 1232g) in carrying out the provisions of this section.

The advisory committee function shall terminate effective June 30, 2023.

3.

The seven nonvoting members of the committee shall be representatives of each of the following agencies or committees, as determined by the agency head or committee chair:

a.

The Virginia Early Hearing Detection and Intervention Program Advisory Committee;

b.

The Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind;

c.

The Infant and Toddler Connection of Virginia;

d.

The Virginia Department of Education;

e.

The Center for Family Involvement at the Virginia Commonwealth University Partnership for People with Disabilities;

f.

The Virginia Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing; and

g.

The Virginia Association of the Deaf.

History.

2022, cc. 240, 238.

§ 22.1-217.1.
Programs for the research and development of innovative methods of teaching children with mental illness, intellectual disability, or serious emotional disturbance.

For the purpose of improving the quality of the education and training provided to the school-age children in state hospitals and training centers operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, there is hereby established a program of grants from such funds as are appropriated by the General Assembly to promote the research and development of innovative methods of teaching children with mental illness, intellectual disability, or serious emotional disturbance in residential settings. This program shall be available to the education directors and instructional staffs of the state hospitals and training centers operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services. The Board of Education shall award these grants on the basis of the recommendations of an advisory committee composed of the Director of the Virginia Treatment Center for Children, two representatives of the Department of Education and two representatives of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services. The advisory committee shall establish objectives for these grants, develop requests for proposals and set criteria for evaluating the applications for funds.

History.

1985, c. 332; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “children with mental illness, mental retardation, or serious emotional disturbance” for “mentally retarded, mentally ill or emotionally disturbed children” in the first sentence and “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” in the second and third sentences.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “children in state hospitals and training centers operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “residents of the state mental health and mental retardation facilities” and “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” in the first sentence and “the state hospitals and training centers operated by” for “the institutions administered by” in the second sentence; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-217.2.
Special education transition materials.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall make available special education transition materials for students and parents to be used during a student’s annual Individualized Education Program meeting as required by the State Board of Education Regulations Governing Special Education Programs for Children with Disabilities in Virginia (8VAC20-81-118 and 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.) and direct local school divisions to use the material to the fullest extent possible. Such materials shall be prepared and updated as necessary by the Department of Education and shall include information describing services that can be provided in the least restrictive environment possible and the purpose and use of temporary guardianship, limited guardianship, and guardianship, as those terms are defined in §

64.2-2000

.

History.

2020, c. 855.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 855, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services (the Department) shall convene a group of stakeholders to study the use of supported decision-making agreements in the Commonwealth, including making recommendations as to the use of supported decision-making agreements as a less restrictive alternative to the appointment of a guardian or conservator for an incapacitated person. The Department shall report the findings and recommendations of the stakeholder group’s study to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary and the House Committee on Health, Welfare, and Institutions no later than November 1, 2020.”

§ 22.1-218.
Reimbursement for placement in private schools; reimbursement of school boards from state funds.

If a child’s individualized education program calls for placement in a private nonreligious school, agency, or institution, payment for reasonable tuition cost and other reasonable charges shall be made from the state pool of funds pursuant to §

2.2-5211

.

Where a school board enters into an agreement with the Wilson Workforce and Rehabilitation Center or a special education regional program established pursuant to regulations of the Board of Education, the Board of Education is authorized to reimburse the school board from such funds as are appropriated for this purpose.

The Board of Education is further authorized to reimburse each school board operating a preschool special education program for children with disabilities aged two through four, through the Standards of Quality Special Education account.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-10.8; 1974, c. 480; 1978, c. 386; 1980, c. 559; 1988, c. 96; 1989, c. 106; 1990, c. 277; 1993, cc. 110, 191; 1996, c. 133; 2005, c. 928; 2015, c. 542.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 928 substituted “nonreligious” for “nonsectarian” in subsection A.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 542 substituted “Wilson Workforce and” for “Woodrow Wilson” in subsection B.

Law Review.

For note, “School Choice and State Constitutions,” see 86 Va. L. Rev. 117 (2000).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Poor and Poor Laws, § 3.

§ 22.1-218.1.
Duty to process placements through the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children.

In order to protect the interests of the Commonwealth and local governments and provide for the safety and welfare of children with disabilities, all placements of children with disabilities facilitated by a school division in an out-of-state special education facility shall be processed through the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children as provided in Chapters 10 (§

63.2-1000

et seq.) and 11 (§

63.2-1100

et seq.) of Title 63.2.

History.

1983, c. 376; 1994, c. 854.

§ 22.1-219.
Use of federal, state or local funds not restricted.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to restrict or prohibit the use of any federal, state or local funds made available under any federal, state or local appropriation or grant.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-10.9; 1974, c. 480; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-220.
Power of counties, cities, and towns to appropriate and expend funds for education of children with disabilities.

The governing body of any county, city or town is hereby authorized and empowered to appropriate and expend funds of the county, city or town in furtherance of the education of children with disabilities residing in such county, city or town who attend Wilson Workforce and Rehabilitation Center or public or private nonsectarian schools, or public or private nonsectarian child-day programs for children below the compulsory school attendance age, whether within or without the county, city or town and whether within or without the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-10.10; 1974, c. 480; 1980, c. 559; 1989, c. 106; 1994, cc. 376, 854; 2015, c. 542.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 542 substituted “Wilson Workforce and Rehabilitation” for “Woodrow Wilson Rehabilitation.”

Law Review.

For note on AIDS in the public schools, see 29 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 881 (1988).

§ 22.1-221.
Transportation of children with disabilities attending public or private special education programs.

Each disabled child enrolled in and attending a special education program provided by the school division pursuant to any of the provisions of § 22.1-216 or § 22.1-218 shall be entitled to transportation to and from such school or class at no cost if such transportation is necessary to enable such child to obtain the benefit of educational programs and opportunities.

A school board may, in lieu of providing transportation on an approved school bus, allot funds to pay the reasonable cost of special arrangement transportation. The Board of Education shall reimburse the school board sixty percent of such cost if funds therefor are available.

Costs for operating approved school buses which are equipped or used primarily for transporting children with disabilities shall be reimbursed according to the regulations promulgated by the Board of Education from such state funds as are appropriated for this purpose.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-10.11; 1974, c. 480; 1975, cc. 464, 513; 1978, c. 386; 1980, c. 559; 1983, c. 521; 1994, c. 854; 1996, cc. 123, 247.

Cross references.

For provisions authorizing school boards to provide for the transportation of pupils generally, see § 22.1-176.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Transportation to special program. —

A local school board may not charge a fee for the transportation of a student enrolled in a specialty program located outside the boundaries of the student’s base school. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Jackson H. Miller, Member, House of Delegates, 10-016, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 24 (3/18/10).

§ 22.1-222.
Repealed by Acts 1985, c. 421.

Cross references.

For present provisions as to rehabilitative services and the rights of the disabled, see §

51.5-1

et seq.